Hawaii statutes.
§11-73 Instruction of precinct officials.
Prior to any election, the chief election officer or clerk in county elections
shall conduct a school of instruction, if deemed necessary, for persons
designated as prospective precinct officials of precincts. They shall notify
the precinct officials of the time and the place of the school of instruction.

All prospective precinct officials shall attend
a school of instruction. The chairperson of the precinct officials shall be
required to also attend a refresher course before each election. It shall be
at the discretion of the chief election officer or the county clerk in county
elections to require those precinct officials with previous training to attend
a school of instruction prior to each election.

No precinct official shall serve unless the
official has received instruction and has been certified by the authorized
instructor to that effect. This section shall not prevent the assignment of a
person who has not received such instruction or such certificate but who is
otherwise qualified, to fill a vacancy among precinct officials when a
qualified certified person is not available. Periodic recertification shall be
required. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(v); am L 1979, c 133,
§2; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next